Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 34. Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Capital Fund.

§ 33.2-3400.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Fund”
means the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Capital Fund.

“NVTC”
means the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission.

“WMATA”
means the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 12 provides: “That (i) the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA) was established pursuant to an interstate compact between Virginia, Maryland, and the District of Columbia to operate a regional mass transit system in the Washington, D.C., metropolitan area; (ii) WMATA is currently the second largest rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the sixth largest bus mass transportation system in the United States; (iii) Section 16 of the WMATA compact embodies the funding principle that ‘the payment of the costs shall be borne by the persons using or benefiting from the Authority’s facilities and services and any remaining costs shall be equitably shared among the federal, District of Columbia and participating local governments’; (iv) the operation of the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the bus mass transportation system by WMATA provides particular and substantial benefit to the persons living, traveling, commuting, and working in those localities embraced by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission; (v) the benefits to such persons include not only access to the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the bus mass transportation system operated by WMATA but also the lessened congestion on roadways and highways as a result of such operations; and (vi) on a typical weekday more than 340,000 trips are taken on WMATA in Virginia. On the basis of these facts, the General Assembly finds that dedicated funding is appropriate and necessary to support the capital needs of WMATA’s rapid heavy rail mass transportation system.”

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 13 provides: “That Virginia shall seek to appoint members to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA) Board of Directors (i) with experience in transit, transportation, or land use planning; transit, transportation, or other public-sector management; engineering; finance; public safety; homeland security; human resources; or the law and (ii) who are familiar with the WMATA system.”

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 14 provides: “That, for projects initiated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority on and after July 1, 2018, and located solely within the Commonwealth, bidders, offers, contractors, or subcontractors (i) shall not, as a condition of the contract, be required to enter into or adhere to or prohibited from entering into or adhering to agreements with one or more labor organizations and (ii) shall not otherwise be discriminated against for becoming or refusing to become or remain signatories or otherwise adhere to agreements with one or more labor organizations.” Acts 2020, cc. 282 and 373, cl. 1 deleted enactment clause 14 of Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856.

§ 33.2-3401.
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Capital Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund for the benefit of the Northern Virginia Transportation District to be known as the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Capital Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenues dedicated to the Fund pursuant to §§

33.2-2400

,

33.2-3404

,

58.1-802.3

,

58.1-1741

,

58.1-1743

, and

58.1-2299.20

shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund as set forth in subsection B and shall be used for the payment of capital purposes incurred, or to be incurred, by WMATA. Interest on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The Comptroller shall disburse funds to WMATA on a monthly basis if NVTC has provided the certification required by subsection B of §

33.2-3402

.

Within the Fund, there shall be established a separate, segregated account into which revenues dedicated to the Fund pursuant to §§

33.2-2400

and

58.1-1741

shall be deposited (the Restricted Account). Revenues deposited into the Restricted Account shall be available for use by WMATA for capital purposes other than for the payment of, or security for, debt service on bonds or other indebtedness of WMATA.
B. 1. Within the Fund, there shall be established a separate, segregated account into which revenues dedicated to the Fund pursuant to §§

33.2-2400

and

58.1-1741

shall be deposited (the Restricted Account). Revenues deposited into the Restricted Account shall be available for use by WMATA for capital purposes other than for the payment of, or security for, debt service on bonds or other indebtedness of WMATA.

Within the Fund, there shall be established a separate, segregated account into which revenues dedicated to the Fund pursuant to §§

33.2-3404

,

58.1-802.3

,

58.1-1743

, and

58.1-2299.20

shall be deposited (the Non-Restricted Account). Revenues deposited into the Non-Restricted Account shall be available for use by WMATA for capital purposes, including for the payment of, or security for, debt service on bonds or other indebtedness of WMATA, or for any other WMATA capital purposes.

The amounts deposited into the Fund and the distribution and expenditure of such amounts shall not be used to calculate or reduce the share of federal, state, or local revenues otherwise available to participating jurisdictions. Further, such revenues and moneys shall not be included in any computation of, or formula for, a locality’s ability to pay for public education, upon which appropriations of state revenues to local governments for public education are determined.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.

§ 33.2-3402.
NVTC oversight.

In any year that funds are deposited into the Fund, the NVTC shall request certain documents and reports from WMATA to confirm the benefits of the WMATA system to persons living, traveling, commuting, and working in the localities that the NVTC comprises. Such documents and reports shall include:

WMATA’s annual capital budget;

WMATA’s annual independent financial audit;

WMATA’s National Transit Data annual profile; and

Single audit reports issued in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principals, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards (2 C.F.R. Part 200).

NVTC shall be responsible for coordinating the delivery of such documents and reports with WMATA. Funding of the Commonwealth to support WMATA pursuant to §

33.2-1526.1

shall be contingent on WMATA providing the documents and reports described in subsection A, and NVTC shall provide annual certification to the Comptroller that such documents and reports have been received.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.

§ 33.2-3403.
NVTC report.

By December 15 of each year that funds are deposited into the Fund, NVTC shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the performance and condition of WMATA. Such report shall contain, at a minimum, documentation of the following:

The safety and reliability of the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and bus network;

The financial performance of WMATA related to the operations of the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system, including farebox recovery, service per rider, and cost per service hour;

The financial performance of WMATA related to the operations of the bus mass transportation system, including farebox recovery, service per rider, and cost per service hour;

Potential strategies to reduce the growth in such costs and to improve the efficiency of WMATA operations;

Use of the funds provided from the Fund to improve the safety and condition of the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system; and

Ridership of the rapid heavy rail mass transportation system and the bus mass transportation system.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856; 2020, c. 792.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 792, substituted “December 15” for “November 1” in the first sentence of the introductory wording.

§ 33.2-3404.
Local transportation support for WMATA.

Each county or city that (i) is located in a transportation district that as of January 1, 2018, meets the criteria established in §

33.2-1936

and (ii) has financial obligations to a transit system that operates a rapid heavy rail mass transit system operating on an exclusive right-of-way that is funded and controlled in part by such transportation district shall annually pay to the Fund an amount as determined by subsection B.

The amount to be paid by each local government pursuant to subsection A shall be determined by multiplying $27.12 million by a fraction the numerator of which shall be such local government’s share of capital funding for WMATA and the denominator of which shall be the total share of capital funding for WMATA for all local governments in the Commonwealth.

A locality subject to subsection A shall pay the amount determined by subsection B by transferring a portion of the revenues received pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-2510

to the Fund. However, in any fiscal year in which a locality subject to subsection A has adopted a budget and a corresponding resolution to provide the amount of funds determined pursuant to subsection B from a source other than the revenues received pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-2510

, such locality may provide the funds for that fiscal year from such other source, and shall not be required to transfer funds received pursuant to subdivision B of §

33.2-2510

.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 854 and 856, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §§

33.2-214.4

,

33.2-286

, and

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

58.1-638

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall not become effective until 30 days after the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each enact legislation or take actions to provide dedicated funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA). The percentage of funding provided by the Commonwealth for its share of WMATA funding pursuant to this act beginning with the fiscal year that this act becomes effective, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be proportional to the amount of funding provided by the District of Columbia and Maryland relative to their respective share of WMATA funding in that fiscal year.” The Virginia Code Commission has advised that the contingency occurred April 25, 2018,
and the effective date is therefore May 25, 2018.